Georgia, session 2025_26, SB249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 2 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to competencies and core curriculum under the "Quality Basic Education Act," is
amended by revising Code Section 20-2-149.3, relating to requirements for computer science
education, as follows:
"20-2-149.3.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
S. B. 249
- 1 -

LC 49 2283
(1) Education in computer science is a critical need for the students of Georgia for the
twenty-first century; and
(2) Less than 0.5 percent of high school graduates have taken a computer science course;
(3) There are thousands of unfulfilled computer science jobs in the state; and
(4) The logical critical thinking skills taught by computer science are now very valuable
in many noncomputer science jobs, as technology has become embedded in most
professions.
(b) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Computer science' means the study of computers, algorithmic processes, coding,
artificial intelligence, emerging technologies, and logical critical thinking, including
computer principles, their hardware and software designs, their implementation, and their
impact on society.
(2) 'Computer science courses and content' means high school courses that teach
computer science as stand-alone implementations and middle school courses that provide
instruction in computer science in stand-alone implementations or by being embedded
in other subjects and focus on how to create and understand technology, rather than by
simply using technology.
(3) 'High-quality professional learning' means professional development activities that:
(A) Clarify the conceptual foundations of computer science;
(B) Teach research based practices, including hands-on and inquiry based learning; and
(C) Are intended for teachers with or without prior exposure to computer science.
(4) 'High-quality professional learning providers' means institutions of higher education
in this state, local school systems, nonprofit organizations, or private entities that have
successfully designed, implemented, and scaled high-quality professional learning for
teachers and are approved or recommended by the State Board of Education in
coordination with the Department of Education.
(5) 'Offer' means providing a course taught by a computer science teacher:
S. B. 249
- 2 -

LC 49 2283
(A) Who is onsite at the physical location of the school; or
(B) Who is not onsite at the physical location of the school but conducts the course
through virtual means with a proctor onsite at the physical location of the school.
(c)(1) Beginning in the 2022-2023 school year:
(A) Each local school system shall provide that at least one high school in its school
system offer a course in computer science;
(B) Each local school system shall provide that all middle schools in its school system
offer instruction in exploratory computer science;
(C) Each state charter school that serves high school students shall offer a course in
computer science;
(D) Each state charter school that serves middle school students shall offer instruction
in exploratory computer science;
(E) Each local school system may provide that all elementary schools in its school
system offer instruction in exploratory computer science; and
(F) Each state charter school that serves elementary school students may offer
instruction in exploratory computer science.
(2) Beginning in the 2023-2024 school year, each local school system shall provide that
at least 50 percent of the high schools in its school system offer a course in computer
science.
(3) Beginning in the 2024-2025 school year, each local school system shall provide that
all high schools in its school system offer a course in computer science.
(4)(A) Beginning in the 2031-2032 school year, each local board of education shall
require all students, as a condition of graduation from high school, to complete a course
in computer science or a career, technical, and agricultural education (CTAE) course
embedded with computer science which meets the requirements provided in
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.
S. B. 249
- 3 -

LC 49 2283
(B) The course required in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph may be earned by
students in any of grades eight through 12 and shall:
(i) Meet or exceed the content standards and any other requirements prescribed by
the State Board of Education for such courses;
(ii) Be made available in a traditional classroom setting, a blended learning
environment, or an online or other technology based format that is tailored to meet the
needs of each participating student; and
(iii) Not increase the number of credits required for graduation.
(C)(i) Except as provided in division (ii) of this subparagraph, a full-credit computer
science course that meets the requirements provided in subparagraph (B) of this
paragraph shall be eligible to satisfy the course required in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph and one unit of credit graduation requirement for one of the following:
(I) One unit of math credit; provided, however, that such unit of credit shall not be
a substitute for Algebra: Concepts and Connections or its equivalent, Geometry:
Concepts and Connections or its equivalent, or Advanced Algebra: Concepts and
Connections or its equivalent;
(II) One unit of science credit; provided, however, that such unit of credit shall not
be a substitute for any biology or physical science requirements;
(III) One unit of CTAE credit;
(IV) One unit of Modern Language or Latin credit;
(V) One unit of Fine Arts credit; or
(VI) One unit of elective credit.
(ii) A student may be permitted to earn more than one unit of credit graduation
requirement by completing more than one computer science course that implements
a minimum course of instruction based on content standards prescribed by the State
Board of Education and which is separate and distinct from such other computer
science course completed by such student, and such student may be permitted to use
S. B. 249
- 4 -

LC 49 2283
multiple units of credit to offset other graduation requirements as provided in this
subparagraph; provided, however, that a student shall not be permitted to offset more
than one unit of math credit and one unit of science credit; and, provided further, that
there shall be no limit to the number of offsets permitted for units of CTAE or elective
100 credits.
101 (D)(i) Except as provided in division (ii) of this subparagraph, a full-credit CTAE
102 course embedded with computer science that meets the requirements provided in
103 subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall be eligible to satisfy the full-credit course
104 required in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and one unit of credit graduation
105 requirement for one of the following:
106 (I) One unit of CTAE credit; or
107 (II) One unit of elective credit.
108 (ii) A student may be permitted to earn more than one unit of credit graduation
109 requirement by completing more than one CTAE course embedded with computer
110 science that implements a minimum course of instruction based on content standards
111 prescribed by the State Board of Education and which is separate and distinct from
112 such other computer science course completed by such student, and such student may
113 be permitted to use multiple units of credit to offset other graduation requirements as
114 provided in this subparagraph.
115 (E) The Department of Education shall establish, and the State Board of Education
116 shall approve, the minimum criteria by with a CTAE course embedded with computer
117 science may be approved.
118 (d) The Department of Education shall ensure that the Georgia Virtual School operated
119 pursuant to Code Section 20-2-319.1 has sufficient capacity to enable schools to utilize
120 computer science courses to meet the needs of such schools as a result of this Code section.
S. B. 249
- 5 -

LC 49 2283
121 (e)(1) Subject to appropriations, grants shall be provided to eligible entities to deliver
122 professional development programs for teachers providing instruction in computer
123 science courses and content.
124 (2) Eligible entities shall include local school systems, consortia of local school systems,
125 local charter schools, state charter schools, and high-quality professional learning
126 providers working in partnership with local school systems.
127 (3) Criteria for grant awards to eligible entities pursuant to this subsection shall include:
128 (A) The number of teachers in a local school system that require training and the
129 number of teachers in a local school system that have already received training; and
130 (B) The willingness of local school systems to make available their teachers who have
131 received training in computer science courses and content to provide computer science
132 instruction in another local school system or systems.
133 (4) The Department of Education shall submit a report on December 1 of each year to
134 the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the
135 chairperson of the Senate Education and Youth Committee, and the chairperson of the
136 House Committee on Education. Such report shall include the number of teachers
137 trained, the number of schools offering training, the number of students served and the
138 demographics of such students, and a list of the eligible entities that provided the
139 training."
140 SECTION 2.
141 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 249
- 6 -